District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0813.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLU1mL~> That this
23
24 Sec. 2. Section4 of the Law to Legalize Lotteries Daily Numbers Game;S,, and Bingo and
1
25 Raffle.s for Charitable Purposes in the Distrid ofColmnbia, effective March 10, 1981 (D.C. Law
26 3-172; D.C. Officiru Code § 36-601.01 et s~), is amended as follows:
27 (a) Section 2-2501(c)(4A)(C) (D.C. OfficiaJ Cod_e § 36-60t01(e)(4A)(C)) is. amended to
28. read as. follows:
29 ''(C) Bingo played:
30 "(i) O\~er the internet or in.an ocline environm.ent;
31 ''(ii) On any machine or mechanical device· that wculd qnalify as or
m
constitute a facsimile of class gmning, as th.at term is defined in section4(8) of the Indian
33 Gaming Regulatory Act, .appro~~ed October 17, 1988 (102 Stat 2467; 25 U.S.C. § 2703(8)); or
1

34 “(iii) On any slot machine.”.
35 (b) Section 2524(a)(8) (D.C. Official Code § 36-601.24(a)(8)) is amended to read as
36 follows.
37 “(8) A prohibition on any machine, device, or terminal that allows a person to:
38 “(A) Play a commercial bingo game against a machine or computerized
39 system;
40 “(B) Play a commercial bingo game against human players located at a
41 location other than the licensed establishment where the person is located; or
42 “(C) Participate in a commercial bingo game from a location other than
43 the licensed establishment where the numbers are called.”
44 Sec. 3. Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
45 (a) Section 47-2001 is amended by adding a new subsection (h-4) to read as follows:
46 “(h-4) “Net commercial bingo gaming revenue” means the total revenue received from
47 commercial bingo games and admission charges, excluding the cost of prizes or winnings
48 distributed, but without regard to other expenses.”.
49 (b) Section 47-2002(a)(9) is amended to read as follows:
50 “(9) The rate of tax shall be 25% of net commercial bingo gaming revenue.”.
51 (c) Section 47-2202(a)(6) is amended to read as follows:
52 “(6) The rate of tax shall be 25% of net commercial bingo gaming revenue.”.
53 Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
54 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
55 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
56 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
2

57 Sec. 5. Effective date.
58 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
59 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
60 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
61 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
62 Columbia Register.
3

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
BRIAN L. SCHWALB PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL
ATTORNEY GENERAL ATTORNEY-CLIENT COMMUNICATION
LEGAL COUNSEL DIVISION
MEMORANDUM
TO: Tomás Talamante
Director
Office of Policy and Legislative Affairs
FROM: Adele El-Khouri
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
DATE: March 17, 2026
SUBJECT: Legal Sufficiency Review of Draft “Commercial Bingo Amendment Act of 2026”
(AE-25-608)
_____________________________________________________________________________________
This is to Certify that
this Office has reviewed the above-referenced draft
legislation and found it to be legally sufficient. If you have any questions in this regard, please do
not hesitate to call me at (202) 262-6402.
_________________________________
Adele El-Khouri
2

Government of the District of Columbia
Office of the Chief Financial Officer
Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
MEMORANDUM
TO: The Honorable Phil Mendelson
Chairman, Council of the District of Columbia
FROM: Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
DATE: May 22, 2026
SUBJECT: Fiscal Impact Statement – Commercial Bingo Amendment Act of 2026
REFERENCE: Draft bill as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on March 19,
2026
Conclusion
Funds are sufficient in the revised fiscal year 2026 and proposed fiscal year 2027 through fiscal year
2030 budget and financial plan to implement the bill. The Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis
Administration (ABCA), Office of Lottery and Gaming (OLG), and Office of Tax and Revenue (OTR)
can implement the bill within current resources.
Background
District law1 established the Lottery and Gaming Control Board as a subordinate division known as
OLG, within the Office of the Chief Financial Officer (OCFO), to regulate lotteries, daily numbers
games, bingo, and raffles for charitable purposes, in the District. The bill amends2 the definition of
“commercial bingo” to mean a bingo game where players pay to participate and the numbers are
drawn and verbally announced in person, with all participants physically present and competing in
the same game. However, the term does not include:
• Bingo organized by certain entities3, including nonprofits, senior groups, and citizen-service
programs;
1 D.C. Official Code § 36-601.01.
2 Commercial Bingo was first approved via the Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2025,
effective September 3, 2025 (D.C. Act 26-146; 72 DCR 9623).
3 D.C. Official Code § 36‑601.23(b), (c), or (d).
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 203, Washington, DC 20004 (202)727-2476
www.cfo.dc.gov

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “Commercial Bingo Amendment Act of 2026”, Draft Bill as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on
March 19, 2026
• Bingo played using a federally defined4 gambling device;
• Bingo played online or over the internet;
• Bingo played on machines that resemble or qualify as class III gaming devices under federal
law5; and
• Bingo played on slot machines.
The bill repeals the prohibition on bingo or raffle devices that allow a person to play bingo against a
machine or computer instead of other in-person players, or that allow a person to join a commercial
bingo game from a location outside the licensed establishment where a live caller is announcing the
numbers. These changes clarify that Class II electronic bingo machines are legal, but still prohibit
commercial bingo that is played over the internet or in an online environment, or on any slot
machine.
Title 47 of District Code governs taxation in the District, including definitions of key terms related to
the imposition of taxes. The bill adds a definition for “net gaming revenue”6 and sets the sales7 and
use8 tax rates for commercial bingo at 25% of net gaming revenue, with proceeds credited9 to the
Lottery, Gambling, and Gaming Fund10 and the General Fund. Taxing bingo operators on their net
proceeds will allow bingo operators to deduct the amount of money, winnings, or prizes paid out to
players.
Financial Plan Impact
Funds are sufficient in the revised fiscal year 2026 and proposed fiscal year 2027 through fiscal year
2030 budget and financial plan to implement the bill. ABCA, OLG, and OTR can implement the bill
within current resources. ABCA requires no additional resources to approve commercial bingo
endorsements.11 Positions necessary for OLG to regulate and enforce laws and rules pertaining to
commercial bingo operations were included in OLG’s fiscal year 2026 budget.12 OTR requires no
additional resources to develop materials related to the implementation of the bill. There is no
additional revenue estimated as a result of this bill since it is unknown how many licensees will
operate, nor if commercial bingo activity will displace other existing taxable sales.
4 As that term is defined by section 1(a) of An Act To prohibit transportation of gambling devices in interstate
and foreign commerce, approved January 2, 1951 (64 Stat. 1134; 15 U.S.C. 1171(a)).
5 As that term is defined in section 4(8) of the Indian Gaming Regulatory Act, approved October 17, 1988 (102
Stat. 2467; 25 U.S.C. § 2703(8)).
6 To mean the total revenue received from commercial bingo games and admission charges, excluding the
cost of prizes or winnings distributed, but without regard to other expenses.
7 By amending D.C. Official Code § 47-2002(a)(9), which sets the rate for commercial bingo at 7.5%.
8 By amending D.C. Official Code § 47-2202(a)(6), which sets the rate for commercial bingo at 7.5%.
9 The first $250,000 shall be deposited in the Lottery, Gambling, and Gaming Fund.
10 D.C. Official Code § 36–601.12.
11 Establishments selling alcohol under an on-premises retailer’s license class C/R, D/R, C/T, D/T, C/H, D/H,
C/X, D/X, C/RB, D/RB, C/N, or D/N must obtain an endorsement from the Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis
Administration to operate commercial bingo on the premises. A commercial bingo endorsement will cost
$300 per year.
12 OLG received funding to hire an Investigator/Licensing Specialist and a Compliance Auditor via the Fiscal
Year 2026 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2025, effective September 3, 2025 (D.C. Act 26-146; 72 DCR
9623).
Page 2 of 2